Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 42 of Title 27, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “de novo judicial review” means an


independent judicial determination of all legal and factual


questions relating to public use, necessity, and compliance with


applicable law, made without any deference to prior findings,


assertions, conclusions, resolutions, interpretations, or


declarations by the condemning authority.



Req. No. 3498 Page 1


B. Any determination made by a condemning authority regarding


whether a proposed taking constitutes a lawful public use, whether


the taking is necessary for that public use, and whether the


condemnation complies with statutory and constitutional requirements


shall be subject to de novo judicial review. A court shall strictly


construe all statutes granting eminent domain in favor of the


property owner and against the condemning authority. Any ambiguity


shall be resolved to limit rather than expand the power to condemn


private property.


C. In any judicial condemnation proceeding, the owner of an


interest in property sought to be condemned shall be entitled,


through the timely filing of an exception to the report of the


commissioners in such proceeding, to a hearing on the issues of


public use or necessity of the taking. At any such hearing, the


condemning authority shall bear the burden of proving by a


preponderance of the evidence that the proposed taking is for a


public use authorized by law, and that the property sought to be


taken is reasonably necessary to accomplish that public use.


Necessity shall be proven separately for each individual part,


parcel, or tract of property sought to be taken, and no taking may


be justified solely by general project necessity. The condemning


authority shall show by a preponderance of the evidence that no


feasible alternative route, alignment, design, or non-condemnation


option exists that would satisfy the public use with less harm to

Req. No. 3498 Page 2


private property, and that all alternatives have been analyzed in


good faith using competent engineering, environmental, and financial


methods. The burden of proof shall remain with the condemning


authority at all times, and a resolution of necessity from the


condemning authority shall not, in and of itself, be conclusive or


sufficient evidence of necessity or lawful public use.


D. At least sixty (60) days prior to a hearing to show


necessity, the condemning authority shall provide the property owner


with all:


1. Engineering studies, surveys, routing analyses, maps,


designs, and feasibility reports;


2. Environmental reviews, assessments, and determinations;


3. Financial analyses and justifications for the project;


4. Communications and memoranda relating to routing, necessity,


or alternatives; and


5. Internal and external evaluations of project purpose or


public use.


E. Property owners invoking their right to a hearing shall have


a right to conduct any and all discovery, and issue any and all


subpoenas, authorized under the Oklahoma Discovery Code and the


Oklahoma Pleading Code. Subject to the Oklahoma Discovery Code,


discovery disputes shall be resolved in favor of disclosure of


information to the property owner.



Req. No. 3498 Page 3


F. If, upon a hearing on public use or necessity, the


condemning authority shall fail to establish its right to condemn


the property, or any part thereof, the property owner shall be


entitled to an award of the property owners’ reasonable attorney


fees, costs, and expert witness fees, to be taxed and collected as


costs in a civil action.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3498 BLB 1/12/2026 6:10:47 PM































Req. No. 3498 Page 4